Indiana, session 2026, HB1057.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-30-5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.74-2005, SECTION
1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A potential design-builder responding to the request
for qualifications under section 2 of this chapter must submit a verified
statement of qualifications setting forth the qualifications of the
potential design-builder and team members, if applicable, and provide
the other information required by the request for qualifications.
(b) The verified statement of qualifications required under this
section must include the following:
(1) A listing of all prime contractors and architectural and
engineering firms that participate financially as part of the team.
(2) A statement that:
(A) the design-builder or the team members have completed
or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and
capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or
complexity; and
(B) proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and
2026 IN 1057—LS 6027/DI 141


training to competently manage and complete the design and
construction of the project.
(3) A statement that the design-builder or team members have the
licenses, registrations, and credentials required to design and
construct the project, including information on the revocation or
suspension of a license, credential, or registration.
(4) A statement that the design-builder has the capacity to obtain
all required payment and performance bonding, liability
insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.
(5) The experience modifier rate, the United States Occupational
Safety and Health Administration total recordable case incident
rate (TCIR) and days away, restricted or transferred case incident
rate (DART) for the design-builder and each design build team,
and the average United States Occupational Safety and Health
Administration TCIR and DART rates for the industrial
classification of the design-builder and each design-build team.
(6) A statement that the design-builder or the employees of the
team performing construction services, including the employees
of all subcontractors, have completed or are enrolled in an
apprenticeship program certified by the United States Department
of Labor Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training. comply with
IC 5-30-8-9, if applicable.
(7) Information regarding any prior serious, repeat, willful, or
criminal violation of the federal Occupational Safety and Health
Act of 1970 and any equivalent violation under a state plan
authorized under Section 18 of the federal act that has become a
final order.
(8) Information concerning the debarment, disqualification, or
removal of the design-builder or a team member from a federal,
state, or local government public works project.
(9) Information concerning the bankruptcy or receivership of the
design-builder or a team member.
SECTION 2. IC 5-30-8-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The definitions set forth in IC 5-16-13-4 apply
throughout this section.
(b) This section applies after June 30, 2026, only to a contractor
that employs ten (10) or more employees.
(c) This section does not apply to a:
(1) developer; or
(2) general contractor;
unless the developer or general contractor has at least one (1)
2026 IN 1057—LS 6027/DI 141


direct employee who performs construction services.
(d) A contractor must provide access to a training program
applicable to the tasks to be performed in the normal course of the
employee's employment with the contractor.
(e) A contractor may comply with this section through any of
the following:
(1) An apprenticeship program.
(2) A program offered by Ivy Tech Community College of
Indiana.
(3) A program offered by Vincennes University.
(4) A program established by or for the contractor.
(5) A program offered by an entity sponsored by the United
States Department of Labor, Bureau of Apprenticeship and
Training.
(6) A program that results in the award of an industry
recognized portable certification.
(7) A program approved by the United States Department of
Transportation, Federal Highway Administration.
(8) A program approved by the Indiana department of
transportation.
(f) This subsection applies after June 30, 2026, to a tier 1 or tier
2 contractor that employs fifty (50) or more journeymen. The tier
1 or tier 2 contractor shall participate in an apprenticeship or
training program that meets the standards established by or
approved by any of the following:
(1) The United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Apprenticeship and Training.
(2) The Indiana department of labor.
(3) The United States Department of Transportation, Federal
Highway Administration.
(4) The Indiana department of transportation.
SECTION 3. IC 5-30-8-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. The following apply to a design-builder and any
member of a team on a public project:
(1) IC 22-5-1.7.
(2) A design-builder and any member of a team may not pay
cash to any individual employed for any work done by the
individual on a public project.
(3) A design-builder and any member of a team must be in
compliance with the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of
1938, as amended (29 U.S.C. 201-209) and IC 22-2-2-1
2026 IN 1057—LS 6027/DI 141


through IC 22-2-2-8.
(4) A design-builder and any member of a team must be in
compliance with IC 22-3-5-1 and IC 22-3-7-34.
(5) A design-builder and any member of a team must be in
compliance with IC 22-4-1 through IC 22-4-39.5.
(6) A design-builder and any member of a team must be in
compliance with IC 4-13-18-1 through IC 4-13-18-7.
SECTION 4. IC 5-32-1-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A public agency awarding a CMc contract for
a project may not in the bid specifications, project agreements, or
other contract documents do any of the following:
(1) Require a bidder, offeror, or contractor in any contractor
tier to enter into or adhere to an agreement with a labor
organization relating to the project or any public works
project.
(2) Prohibit a bidder, offeror, or contractor in any contractor
tier from entering into or adhering to an agreement with a
labor organization relating to the project or any public works
project.
(3) Discriminate against a bidder, offeror, or contractor in
any contractor tier for any of the following:
(A) Becoming or remaining a signatory to an agreement
with a labor organization relating to the project or any
public works project.
(B) Refusing to become or remain a signatory to an
agreement with a labor organization relating to the project
or any public works project.
(C) Adhering or refusing to adhere to an agreement with
a labor organization relating to the project or any public
works project.
(b) A public agency may not award a grant, tax abatement, or
tax credit that is conditioned upon a requirement that the person
awarded the grant, tax abatement, or tax credit include a term
described in subsection (a) in a CMc contract for the project that
is the subject of the grant, tax abatement, or tax credit.
(c) This section does not do any of the following:
(1) Prohibit a public agency from awarding a CMc contract,
grant, tax abatement, or tax credit to a bidder, offeror, or
contractor in any contractor tier that enters into or that is a
party to an agreement with a labor organization, if both of the
following apply:
2026 IN 1057—LS 6027/DI 141


(A) Being or becoming a party or adhering to an
agreement with a labor organization is not a condition for
award of the CMc contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax
credit.
(B) The public agency does not discriminate against a
bidder, offeror, or contractor in the awarding of the CMc
contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit based upon
the bidder's, offeror's, or contractor's status as being or
becoming, or the willingness or refusal to become, a party
to an agreement with a labor organization.
(2) Prohibit a contractor in any contractor tier from
voluntarily entering into or complying with an agreement
entered into with a labor organization in regard to a CMc
contract with a public agency or funded in whole or in part
from a grant, tax abatement, or tax credit from a public
agency.
(3) Prohibit employers or other parties from entering into
agreements or engaging in any other activity protected by the
federal National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. 151-169).
(4) Interfere with the labor relations of parties that are not
regulated under the federal National Labor Relations Act (29
U.S.C. 151-169).
(d) A public agency may exempt a particular project, CMc
contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit from the requirements
of any or all of the provisions of this section if the public agency
finds, after public notice and hearing, that special circumstances
require an exemption to avert an imminent threat to public health
or safety. A finding of special circumstances under this subsection
may not be based on the possibility or presence of a labor dispute
concerning:
(1) the use of contractors at any contractor tier that are not
signatories to, or otherwise do not adhere to, agreements with
one (1) or more labor organizations; or
(2) employees on the project who are not members of, or
affiliated with, a labor organization.
2026 IN 1057—LS 6027/DI 141